California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person shall not publish or disclose or permit or cause to be published or disclosed a list of persons receiving public social services. Any county welfare department in this state may release lists of applicants for, or recipients of, public social services, to any other county welfare department or the State Department of Social Services, and these lists or any other records shall be released when requested by any county welfare department or the State Department of Social Services. These lists or other records shall only be used for purposes directly connected with the administration of public social services or to notify a public social service recipient of their potential eligibility for other benefits and services not administered by the State Department of Social Services, including, but not limited to, education and access to
 critical public health services and poverty-alleviating benefits, as determined by the State Department of Social Services. Except for those purposes, a person shall not publish, disclose, or use or permit or cause to be published, disclosed, or used any confidential information pertaining to an applicant or recipient.

(c) Any county welfare department and the State Department of Social Services shall provide any governmental entity that is authorized by law to conduct an audit or similar activity in connection with the administration of public social services, including any committee or legislative body so authorized, with access to any public social service applications and records described in subdivision (a) to the extent of the authorization. Those committees, legislative bodies, and other entities may only request or use these records for the purpose of investigating the administration of public social services, and shall not disclose the
 identity of any applicant or recipient except in the case of a criminal or civil proceeding conducted in connection with the administration of public social services.

(d) This section does not prohibit the furnishing of this information to other public agencies to the extent required for verifying eligibility or for other purposes directly connected with the administration of public social services, or to county superintendents of schools or superintendents of school districts only as necessary for the administration of federally assisted programs providing assistance in cash or in-kind or services directly to individuals on the basis of need. Any person knowingly and intentionally violating this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) This section does not prohibit employees of a county’s adult protective services agency or a county’s child welfare agency from disclosing
 information with each other for the purpose of multidisciplinary teamwork in the prevention, intervention, management, or treatment of child abuse or neglect or abuse or neglect of an elder or dependent adult.

(f) In the context of a petition for the appointment of a conservator for a person who is receiving, or has received, aid from a public agency, as indicated above, or in the context of a criminal prosecution for a violation of Section 368 of the Penal Code both of the following shall apply:

(1) An adult protective services employee or ombudsperson may answer truthfully at any proceeding related to the petition or prosecution, when asked if the employee or ombudsperson is aware of information that they believe is related to the legal mental capacity of that aid recipient or the need for a conservatorship for that aid recipient. If the adult protective services employee or
 ombudsperson states that they are aware of such information, the court may order the adult protective services employee or ombudsperson to testify about personal observations and to disclose all relevant agency records.

(2) The court may order the adult protective services employee or ombudsperson to testify about personal observations and to disclose any relevant agency records if the court has other independent reason to believe that the adult protective services employee or ombudsperson has information that would facilitate the resolution of the matter.

(g) The State Department of Social Services may make rules and regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of all records, papers, files, and communications pertaining to the administration of the laws relating to public social services under its jurisdiction. The rules and regulations shall be binding on all
 departments, officials, and employees of the state, or of any political subdivision of the state, and may provide for giving information to, or exchanging information with, agencies, public or political subdivisions of the state, and may provide for giving information to, or exchanging information with, agencies, public or private, that are engaged in planning, providing, or securing social services for, or on behalf of, recipients or applicants; and for making case records available for research purposes, provided that making these case records available will not result in the disclosure of the identity of applicants for, or recipients of, public social services and will not disclose any personal information in a manner that would link the information disclosed to the individual to whom it pertains, unless the department has complied with subdivision (t) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code.

(h) A person, including every public officer and
 employee, who knowingly secures or possesses, other than in the course of official duty, an official list or a list compiled from official sources, published or disclosed in violation of this section, of persons who have applied for, or who have been granted, any form of public social services for which state or federal funds are made available to the counties is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(i) This section does not prohibit an employee of a county welfare department from disclosing confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to a state or local law enforcement agency investigating or gathering information regarding a criminal act committed in a welfare department office, a criminal act against a county or state welfare worker, or a criminal act witnessed by a county or state welfare worker while involved in the administration of public social services at any location. Further, this section does not prohibit
 an employee of a county welfare department from disclosing confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to a state or local law enforcement agency investigating or gathering information regarding a criminal act intentionally committed by the applicant or recipient against an off-duty county or state welfare worker in retaliation for an act performed in the course of the welfare worker’s duty when the person committing the offense knows, or reasonably should know, that the victim is a state or county welfare worker. These criminal acts shall include only those that are in violation of state or local law. Disclosure of confidential information pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the applicant’s or recipient’s name, physical description, and address.

(j) The provisions of this section shall be operative only to the extent permitted by federal law and shall not apply to, but exclude, Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3, and for which a grant-in-aid is received by this state from the United States government pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(k) (1) Public social services, as defined in Section 10051, includes publicly funded health care services administered or supervised by the department or the State Department of Health Care Services, except that, as used in this section, it does not include the Medi-Cal program. This subdivision does not affect or alter the exclusions contained in subdivision (j) or the confidentiality provisions contained in Section 14100.2.

(2) This subdivision clarifies existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 229.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of Section 10850, the activities of a multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of child abuse or neglect, or of the abuse of elder or dependent persons are activities performed in the administration of public social services, and a member of the team may disclose and exchange any information or writing that also is kept or maintained in connection with any program of public social services or otherwise designated as confidential under state law which he or she reasonably believes is relevant to the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of child abuse or neglect, or of the abuse of elder or dependent persons to
 other members of the team. All discussions relative to the disclosure or exchange of any such information or writing during team meetings are confidential and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, testimony concerning any such discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Child abuse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18951. As used in this section, “abuse of elder or dependent persons” has the meaning given in Section 15610.07.

(2) “Multidisciplinary personnel team” means a team as specified in Section 15610.55 relative to the abuse of elder or dependent persons or 18951 relative to child abuse or neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 551, Sec. 3.   (AB 2322)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.2.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10850, factual information relating to eligibility provided solely by the public assistance recipient contained in applications and records made or kept by any public officer or agency in connection with the administration of any public assistance program shall be open for inspection by the recipient to which the information relates and by any other person authorized in writing by such recipient. The written authorization shall be dated and signed by such recipient and shall expire one year from the date of execution. In the event of any hearing under the provisions of this division, the attorney or authorized representative of the applicant or recipient shall be entitled to inspect the case record relating to the applicant or recipient prior to, as well as during, the hearing.

No list or names obtained through such access to such records or applications as provided in this section shall be used for any commercial or political purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10850.1 by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10850, an authorized employee of a county welfare department may disclose confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to any law enforcement agency where a warrant has been issued for the arrest of the applicant or recipient for the commission of a felony or a misdemeanor. Information that may be released pursuant to this section shall be limited to the name, address, telephone number, birth date, social security number, and physical description of the applicant for, or recipient of, public social services.

(b) A county welfare department may release the information specified by this section to any law enforcement agency only upon a written request from the agency specifying that a warrant of arrest for the commission of a felony or misdemeanor has been issued against the applicant or recipient. This request may be made only by the head of the law enforcement agency, or by an employee of the agency so authorized and identified by name and title by the head of the agency in writing to the county welfare department. A county welfare department shall notify all applicants of public social services that release of confidential information from their records will not be protected if a felony or misdemeanor arrest warrant is issued against the applicant. A recipient of public social services shall be notified, at the time of renewal of his or her application for public social services, that a release of confidential information can be made if a felony or misdemeanor arrest warrant is issued against the recipient.

(c) This section shall not be construed to authorize the release of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving public social services.

(d) The provisions of this section shall be operative only to the extent permitted by federal law. The section shall not apply to, but shall exclude, the Medi-Cal program, established pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and following.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 227, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 918, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Applicability is subject to limitations in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

10850.31.

(a) For the CalWORKs program and CalFresh only, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the address, social security number, and, if available, photograph of any applicant or recipient shall be made available, on request, to any federal, state, or local law enforcement officer if the officer furnishes the county welfare department with the name of the applicant or recipient and notifies the county welfare department that the following apply:

(1) Any one of the following applies:

(A) The applicant or recipient is fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody, or confinement after conviction, for a crime that, under the
 law of the place the applicant is fleeing, is a felony, or, in the case of New Jersey, a high misdemeanor.

(B) The applicant or recipient is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under state or federal law.

(C) The applicant or recipient has information that is necessary for the officer to conduct an official duty related to those issues stated in paragraph (1) or (2).

(2) Locating or apprehending the applicant or recipient is an official duty of the law enforcement officer.

(3) The request is being made in the proper exercise of an official duty.

(b) This section shall not authorize the release of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving public
 social services under the CalWORKs program or CalFresh.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 36.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.4.

(a) Within five business days of learning that a child fatality has occurred in the county and that there is a reasonable suspicion that the fatality was caused by abuse or neglect, the custodian of records for the county child welfare agency, upon request, shall release the following information:

(1) The age and gender of the child.

(2) The date of death.

(3) Whether the child resided in foster care or in the home of the child’s parent or guardian at the time of death.

(4) Whether an investigation is
 being conducted by a law enforcement agency or the county child welfare agency.

(b) All cases in which abuse or neglect, as defined by paragraph (1) of subdivision (k), leads to a child’s death shall be subject to the disclosures required in subdivision (c). Abuse or neglect is determined to have led to a child’s death if one or more of the following conditions are met:

(1) A county child protective services agency determines that the abuse or neglect was substantiated.

(2) A law enforcement investigation concludes that abuse or neglect occurred.

(3) A coroner or medical examiner concludes that the child who died had suffered abuse or neglect.

(c) Upon completion of the child abuse or neglect investigation into the child’s death, as described in subdivision (b), the following documents from the juvenile case file shall be released by the custodian of records upon request, subject to the redactions set forth in subdivision (e):

(1) All of the information in subdivision (a).

(2) For cases in which the child’s death occurred while living with a parent or guardian, all previous referrals of abuse or neglect of the deceased child while living with that parent or guardian shall be disclosed along with the following documents:

(A) The emergency response referral information form and the emergency response notice
 of referral disposition form completed by the county child welfare agency relating to the abuse or neglect that caused the death of the child.

(B) Any cross reports completed by the county child welfare agency to law enforcement relating to the deceased child.

(C) All risk and safety assessments completed by the county child welfare services agency relating to the deceased child.

(D) All health care records of the deceased child, excluding mental health records, related to the child’s death and previous injuries reflective of a pattern of abuse or neglect.

(E) Copies of police reports about the person against whom the child abuse or neglect was substantiated.

(F) A description of child protective or other services provided and actions taken by the child welfare agency, and juvenile court if applicable, relating to the deceased child, addressing any services and actions that are not otherwise disclosed within other documents required for release pursuant to this section, including the date and a written description of any such service or action taken.

(3) For cases in which the child’s death occurred while the child was in foster care, the following documents in addition to those specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) generated while the child was living in the foster care placement that was the placement at the time of the child’s death:

(A) Records pertaining to the foster
 placement’s initial licensing and renewals and type of license or licenses held, if in the case file.

(B) All reported licensing violations, including notices of action,
 if in the case file.

(C) Records of the training completed by the foster parents, if in the case file.

(d) (1) The documents and information listed in paragraph (1) of, and subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (c) shall be released to the public by the custodian of records within 10 business days of the request or the disposition of the investigation, whichever is later.

(2) The description listed in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be released to the public by the custodian of records within 10 business days after the release of the documents pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) (1) Prior to releasing any document pursuant to subdivision (c), the custodian of records shall redact the following information:

(A) The names, addresses, telephone numbers, ethnicity, religion, or any other identifying information of any person or institution, other than the county or the State Department of Social Services, that is mentioned in the documents listed in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c).

(B) Any information that would, after consultation with the district attorney, jeopardize a criminal investigation or proceeding.

(C) Any information that is privileged, confidential, or not subject to disclosure pursuant to any other state or federal law.

(2) (A) The State Department of Social Services shall promulgate a regulation listing the laws described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) and setting forth standards governing redactions.

(B) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until emergency regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Social Services may implement the changes made to Section 827 and this section at the 2007–08 Regular Session of the Legislature through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director. The department shall adopt emergency regulations, as necessary to implement those changes, no
 later than January 1, 2009.

(C) The adoption of regulations pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed to be an emergency necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time the final regulations shall be adopted.

(f) Upon receiving a request for the documents listed in subdivision (c), the custodian of records shall notify and provide a copy of the request and the responsive documents upon counsel for any child who is directly or indirectly
 connected to the juvenile case file. If counsel for a child, including the deceased child or any sibling of the deceased child, objects to the release of any part of the documents listed in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c), they may petition the juvenile court for relief to prevent the release of any document or part of a document requested pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(g) Juvenile case file records that are not subject to disclosure pursuant to this section shall only be disclosed upon an order by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 827.

(h) Once documents pursuant to this section have been released by the custodian of records, the State Department of Social Services or the county welfare department or agency may comment on the case
 within the scope of the release. If the county welfare department or agency comments publicly about the case within the scope of the release pursuant to this subdivision, the social worker on the case may also comment publicly about the case within the scope of the release.

(i) Information released by a custodian of records consistent with the requirements of this section does not require prior notice to any other individual.

(j) Each county welfare department or agency shall notify the State Department of Social Services of every child fatality that occurred within its jurisdiction that was the result of child abuse or neglect. Based on these notices and any other relevant information in the State Department of Social Services’ possession, the department shall annually
 issue a report identifying the child fatalities and any systemic issues or patterns revealed by the notices and other relevant information.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Child abuse or neglect” and “abuse or neglect” have the same meaning as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Custodian of records,” for the purposes of this section and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 827, means the county welfare department or agency.

(3) “Juvenile case files” or “case files” includes any juvenile court files, as defined in Rule 5.552 of the California Rules of Court, and any county child welfare department or agency or
 State Department of Social Services records regardless of whether they are maintained electronically or in paper form.

(4) “Substantiated” has the same meaning as that term is used with respect to a substantiated report as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code.

(l) A person disclosing juvenile case file information as required by this section shall not be subject to liability in any civil or criminal proceeding for complying with the requirements of this section.

(m) This section shall apply only to deaths that occur on or after January 1, 2008.

(n) This section does not require a custodian of records to retain documents beyond any date
 otherwise required by law.

(o) This section does not require a custodian of records to obtain documents not in the case file.

(p) This section does not authorize the disclosure of information that reveals the identity of a person or persons who provided information related to suspected abuse, neglect, or maltreatment of the child.

(q) (1) If the death of a child or nonminor dependent occurred while the child or nonminor dependent was subject to the jurisdiction of the court, the court may retain jurisdiction on its own motion or at the request of any party to the dependency case for the exclusive purpose of receiving documents and information, including medical records, police
 reports, and autopsy reports, related to the circumstances of the death.

(2) If a court retains jurisdiction pursuant to paragraph (1), the following requirements shall be satisfied:

(A) The custodian of records shall treat the juvenile court as a requester pursuant to subdivision (c).

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the court shall retain jurisdiction until the records have been received.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “party” includes a deceased child’s or nonminor dependent’s
 parent, legal guardian or Indian custodian and their counsel of record, if any, the counsel who had been representing the deceased child or nonminor dependent at the time of the child’s or nonminor dependent’s death, any intervening sibling and their counsel, and a child’s or nonminor dependent’s tribe regardless of whether the tribe has intervened pursuant to Section 224.4 and any counsel for the tribe.

(4) The court shall terminate all jurisdiction upon receiving records for the purposes described in paragraph (1), even if the cause of death is
 indeterminate.

(5) This subdivision does not require a child welfare agency to gather information from other investigating agencies for the purpose of providing them to the juvenile court if the child welfare agency is not already investigating the cause of death.

(6) The Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court to implement this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 62.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.45.

(a) Within 10 business days of learning that a child near fatality that has been determined to have been caused by abuse or neglect, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (l), has occurred in the county, the custodian of records for the county child welfare agency, upon request, shall release all of the following information:

(1) The age and gender of the child.

(2) The date of the near fatality.

(3) Whether the child resided in foster care or in the home of his or her parent or guardian at the time of the near fatality.

(4) Whether an investigation is being conducted by a law enforcement agency or the county child welfare agency.

(b) All cases in which abuse or neglect leads to a child’s near fatality, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (l), shall be subject to the disclosures required in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(c) Findings or information disclosed under this subdivision, upon request, shall consist of a written report that includes all of the following information:

(1) The age and gender of the child.

(2) The date the abuse or neglect occurred that resulted in the near fatality, if known, and the date that a licensed physician determined the child victim to be in serious or critical medical condition, if known.

(3) Whether the child resided in foster care or in the home of his or her parent or guardian at the time of the near fatality.

(4) The cause of, and circumstances regarding, the near fatality.

(5) A description of reports received, child protective or other services provided, and actions taken by the county child welfare services agency and juvenile court, if applicable, regarding both of the following:

(A) Suspected or substantiated abuse or neglect of the child near fatality victim.

(B) Suspected or substantiated abuse or neglect of other children that is related to the abuse or neglect described in subparagraph (A).

(6) The description required by paragraph (5) shall provide a written narrative that includes, but is not limited to, the following information:

(A) The dates of reports, investigations, services provided, and actions
 taken.

(B) The investigative disposition for each report.

(C) Any comments provided by the involved social worker or workers for the written narrative regarding the investigations, services provided, and actions taken.

(d) Upon completion of the child abuse or neglect investigation into a child’s near fatality, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (l), the following documents from the juvenile case file shall be released by the custodian of records upon request, subject to the redactions described in subdivision (f):

(1) For cases in which the child’s near fatality occurred while living with a parent or guardian, all previous referrals of abuse or neglect of the child suffering the near fatality while living with that parent or guardian, along with the following documents:

(A) The emergency response referral information form and emergency response notice of referral disposition form completed by the county child welfare agency relating to the abuse or neglect that caused the near fatality of the child.

(B) Any cross reports completed by the county child welfare services
 agency to law enforcement relating to the child suffering the near fatality.

(C) All risk and safety assessments completed by the county child welfare services agency relating to the child suffering the near fatality.

(D) Copies of police reports about the person against whom the child abuse or neglect was substantiated.

(2) For cases in which the child’s near fatality occurred while the child was in foster care, the following documents, in addition to those specified in paragraph (1), generated while the child was living in the foster care placement that was the placement at the time of the child’s near fatality:

(A) Records pertaining to the foster parents’
 initial licensing and renewals and type of license or licenses held if in the case file.

(B) All reported licensing violations, including notices of action, if in the case file.

(C) Records of the training completed by the foster parents if in the case file.

(e) (1) When disclosure is requested pursuant to subdivisions
 (c) and (d), all required findings and information shall be released to the public by the custodian of records within 30 calendar days of either the request or the disposition of the investigation, whichever is later.

(2) When disclosure is requested pursuant to subdivision (c), the county shall submit a copy of the description and written narrative required in subdivision
 (c) to the State Department of Social Services within 20 calendar days of the request or the disposition of the investigation, whichever is later. Within 10 calendar days of receipt, the State Department of Social Services shall review the description and written narrative submitted by the county against the case file and notify the county of any discrepancies or other concerns prior to the county’s release of the information pursuant to paragraph (1).

(f) The information and records subject to disclosure pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not include, and the custodian of records shall not disclose, any of the following information:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, ethnicity, religion, or any other identifying information of any person or institution, other than the county or the State Department of Social Services, that is referenced in subdivision (c) or (d).

(2) Any information that would, after consultation with the district attorney, jeopardize a criminal investigation or proceeding.

(3) Any information that is privileged, confidential, or not subject to disclosure pursuant to any other state or federal law.

(4) All health care records related to the child or the child’s family.

(5) (A) Any information referenced in the report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) or contained in any document listed in subdivision (d) that is not relevant to the near fatality, consistent with regulations or all-county letters or similar instructions issued pursuant to subdivision (r). Subject to subparagraphs (B) and (C), those regulations or all-county letters or similar instructions shall provide further guidance regarding persons or conduct that is not relevant. This includes, but is not limited to, any information referenced in the report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) or contained in any document listed in subdivision (d) regarding any adult whose activities are not part of an event or events or do not have a material bearing on the circumstances that led to the near fatality, pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) Information regarding the agency’s handling of the case that may indicate a pattern of events or have a
 material
 bearing on the circumstances that led to the near fatality is relevant for purposes of subparagraph (A).

(C) Any record of any action or observation of any individual acting in his or her professional capacity is relevant for purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(g) Upon receiving a request for the information described in subdivisions (c) and (d), the custodian of records shall notify and provide a copy of the request to the counsel for any child who is directly or indirectly connected to the juvenile case file. If the counsel for a child, including the child near fatality victim or any sibling of the child victim, objects to the release of any part of the information listed in subdivisions
 (c) and (d), counsel may petition the juvenile court for relief to prevent the release of any document or part of a document requested pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(h) Juvenile case file records that are not subject to disclosure pursuant to this section shall only be disclosed upon an order by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 827.

(i) Once documents have been released by the custodian of records pursuant to this section, the State Department of Social Services or the county welfare department or agency may comment on the case within the scope of the release. If the county welfare department or agency comments publicly about the case within the scope of the release pursuant to this subdivision, the social worker on the case may also comment publicly about the case within the scope of the release.

(j) Information released by a custodian of records consistent with the requirements of this section does not require prior notice to any other individual.

(k) Each county child welfare services agency shall notify the State Department of Social Services of
 every child near fatality that occurred within its jurisdiction that was the result of child abuse or neglect. Based on these notices and any other relevant information in the State Department of Social Services’ possession, the department shall annually issue a report identifying the child near fatalities and any systemic issues or patterns revealed by the notices and other relevant information.

(l) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Child abuse or neglect” and “abuse or neglect” have the same meaning as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code. “Child abuse or neglect” and “abuse or neglect” shall not include near fatalities caused by the following persons, unless neglect by a parent, guardian, or foster care provider contributed to the circumstances of the near fatality:

(A) An alleged perpetrator who was unknown to the child or family prior to the abuse that caused the near fatality.

(B) A minor, unless acting in the role of a caretaker, who is alleged to have caused the near fatality.

(2) “Custodian of records” means the county welfare department or agency.

(3) “Juvenile case files” or “case files” includes any juvenile court files, as defined in Rule 5.552 of the California Rules of Court, and any county child welfare department or agency or State Department of Social Services records regardless of whether they are maintained electronically or in paper form.

(4) (A) “Near fatality” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5106a of Title 42 of the United States Code under the federal Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act.

(B) Abuse or neglect is deemed to have resulted in a child’s near fatality if either of the following conditions is met:

(i) A law enforcement investigation concludes that
 child abuse or neglect occurred.

(ii) A county child welfare services agency determines that the child abuse or neglect was substantiated.

(5) “Substantiated” has the same meaning as that term is used with respect to a substantiated report as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code.

(m) A person disclosing juvenile case file information as required by this section
 shall not be subject to liability in any civil or criminal proceeding for complying with the requirements of this section.

(n) This section shall apply only to near fatalities that occur on or after January 1, 2017.

(o) This section does not require a custodian of records to retain documents beyond any date otherwise required by law.

(p) This section does not require a custodian of records to obtain documents not in the case file.

(q) This section does not authorize the disclosure of information that reveals the identity of a person or persons who provided information related to suspected abuse, neglect, or maltreatment of a child.

(r) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Social Services
 may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions following consultation with stakeholders. This consultation shall commence no later than October 1, 2016, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following stakeholders: child welfare advocates, representatives of organizations that have filed requests pursuant to Section 10850.4, advocates for foster youth, labor organizations, representatives of counties, and legislative staff. Rulemaking to implement this section pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act shall commence no later than January 1,
 2018, and shall be concluded as soon as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 320, Sec. 4.   (AB 1625)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.5.
